California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(d) Secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be kept under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75642.

The commission shall adopt procedures to grant individuals aggrieved by its actions or determinations an informal hearing before the commission or before a committee of the commission designated for this purpose. Appeals from decisions of the commission may be made to the secretary. The determination of the secretary is subject to judicial review upon petition filed with the appropriate superior court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 57.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75643.

(a) The commission may commence civil actions and utilize all remedies provided in law or equity for the collection of assessments and civil penalties and for obtaining injunctive relief or specific performance regarding this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. A court shall issue to the commission any requested writ of attachment or injunctive relief upon a prima facie showing by verified complaint that a named defendant has violated this chapter or any regulation of the commission, including, but not limited to, the nonpayment of assessments. No bond shall be required to be posted by the commission as a condition for the issuance of any writ of attachment or injunctive relief.

(b) A writ of attachment shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing specified in Section 485.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure is not required. Injunctive relief shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing of irreparable harm or inadequate remedy at law specified in Sections 526 and 527 of that code is not required.

(c) Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business involving apples until there is full compliance and satisfaction of the judgment. Upon a favorable judgment for the commission, it is entitled to receive reimbursement for any reasonable attorney’s fees and other actual related costs. Venue for these actions may be established at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75643.1.

Any action by the commission to recover any penalty or obtain any other remedy that is prescribed under this chapter shall be commenced within two years from the date of the alleged violation. Any action against the commission by any person shall be commenced by the commission within two years from the date of the act of which the person complains.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 58.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75643.2.

It is not necessary for the commission to allege or prove that an adequate remedy at law does not exist in any action brought under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 59.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75644.

The suspension or termination of this chapter shall not affect or waive any right, duty, obligation, or liability which has arisen or which may thereafter arise in connection with this chapter, release or extinguish any violation of this chapter, or affect or impair any right or remedies of the commission with respect to any violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Continuation or Suspension and Termination [75651. - 75656.]

75651.

Every five years after the implementation of this chapter, or every fifth year after an industry-petitioned referendum pursuant to Section 75654, the secretary shall hold a hearing to determine whether the operation of this chapter should be continued. If the secretary finds after the hearing that a substantial question exists among eligible producers regarding whether the operation of this chapter should be continued, the secretary shall submit the chapter to a reapproval referendum. If a reapproval referendum is required, the operation of this chapter shall be continued in effect if the secretary finds that a majority of the eligible producers voting in the referendum voted in favor of continuing this chapter. No bond or security shall be required for the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 399, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

75652.

If the secretary finds after conducting a hearing that no substantial question exists regarding whether the operation of this chapter should be continued or that a favorable vote has been given in a referendum, the secretary shall so certify and this chapter shall remain operative. If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given, he or she shall so certify and declare the operation of this chapter and the commission suspended upon the expiration of the then current marketing year. Thereupon, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and the funds distributed in the manner provided in Section 75655.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 399, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

75653.

(a) Upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the membership of the commission that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the secretary that the operation of this chapter be suspended. However, any suspension shall not become effective until the expiration of the current marketing year.

(b) The secretary shall, upon receipt of the recommendation, or may, after a public hearing to review a petition filed with the secretary requesting a suspension signed by not less than 20 percent of the eligible producers by number who produced not less than 20 percent of the total volume of apples in the immediately preceding marketing year, hold a referendum to determine if the operations of the commission shall be suspended. However, the secretary shall not hold a referendum as a result of the petition unless the petitioner shows, by a preponderance of evidence, in a manner prescribed by the secretary, that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes.

(c) The secretary shall establish a referendum period, which shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days in duration. The secretary may prescribe additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct the referendum. At the close of the established referendum period, the secretary shall tabulate the ballots filed during the period. The secretary shall suspend the operation of this chapter if the secretary finds that at least 40 percent of the total number of persons from the list established by the secretary have participated in the referendum and that either one of the following has occurred:

(1) Sixty-five percent or more of the eligible producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the eligible producers so voting produced and marketed a majority of the total quantity of apples in the preceding marketing year by all of the eligible producers who voted in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the eligible producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the eligible producers so voting produced and marketed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of apples in the preceding marketing year by all of the eligible producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 60.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75654.

(a) The secretary shall terminate the commission at the end of the then current marketing year if the secretary finds that the termination of the commission is requested in writing, within a 90-day period, by at least 51 percent of the eligible producers that produce and market at least 51 percent of the total volume of apples.

(b) The person or persons originating the request shall file a written notice with the secretary in a manner that establishes the date the request is initiated. Any person may withdraw his or her name from the petition requesting the termination prior to the time the request is presented to the secretary.

(c) The signatures on the petition requesting the termination need not all be appended to one sheet of paper. Each person signing the petition shall specify his or her place of business in a manner that will enable the location to be readily ascertained.

(d) The petition shall bear a copy of the notice of intention to terminate the commission. Signatures shall be secured within the time limit specified in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 60.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75655.

After the effective date of the suspension, the operation of the commission shall be concluded and any and all funds remaining, held by the commission, and not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating the operations of the commission, shall be returned upon a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding marketing year. However, if the commission finds that the amounts so returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the pro rata refund to these persons, any funds remaining, after the payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating operations, shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid into an appropriate program conducted by the University of California or the California State University, or another state agency that deals with the purposes of this chapter. If no program exists, the funds shall be paid into the State Treasury as unclaimed trust funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 60.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75656.

Upon suspension of this chapter, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all producers and handlers whose names and addresses are on file with the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 60.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. California Cherry Commission [76001. - 76185.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration and General Provisions [76001. - 76006.]

76001.

The inability of cherry producers to maintain or expand present markets for California cherries may result in unnecessary economic waste.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76002.

These conditions vitally concern the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state. It is, therefore, in the public interest to protect and enhance the reputation of California cherries in intrastate, interstate, and foreign markets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76003.

The promotional, educational, economic, and marketing research, and any similar activities authorized by this chapter will serve to expand existing markets, create new markets for California cherries, and prevent economic waste.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76004.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of this state to aid in preventing economic waste in the marketing of cherries, to develop more efficient and equitable methods in marketing, and to provide production research, and to carry out the purposes and policies of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 31.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76005.

A commission form of administration created by this chapter is designed to deal with the broad fields of advertising, promotion, marketing research, and production research.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76006.

No action taken by the commission, nor by any individual in accordance with this chapter or with the rules and regulations adopted under the chapter, is a violation of the so-called Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Fair Trade Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16900) of that Part 2), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of that Part 2), or any statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [76021. - 76034.]

76021.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76022.

“Cherry” means any variety of cherry produced in the state, including any cherries produced in this state and delivered to a processor for processing into any cherry product.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76023.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76024.

“Commission” means the California Cherry Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76025.

“Commissioner” means any member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76026.

“Grower-handler” means any person who engages in the operation of selling, marketing, or distributing cherries which he or she has produced. When the grower-handler is a corporation, all the directors and officers of the corporation in their capacity as individuals are included, and any liability for failure to collect or make payment of assessments to which a corporate grower-handler may be subject pursuant to this chapter includes the same liability for each individual director or officer of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 32.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76027.

“Shipper” means any person who engages in the operation of selling, marketing, handling, or distributing cherries which he or she has purchased or acquired from a producer, or which he or she is marketing on behalf of a producer, whether as owner, agent, employee, broker, or otherwise. When the shipper is a corporation, all the directors and officers of the corporation in their capacity as individuals are included, and any liability for failure to collect or make payment of assessments to which a corporate shipper may be subject pursuant to this chapter includes the same liability for each individual director or officer of the corporation.

 “Shipper” does not include a retailer, except a retailer who purchases or acquires from, or handles on behalf of any producer, cherries which were not previously subject to regulation by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 33.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76028.

“Ex officio member” means a nonvoting member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76029.

“Processor” means every person and every plant within this state to whom or to which cherries are delivered for the purpose of drying, dehydrating, canning, pressing, brining, crushing, extracting, cooking, quick freezing, or for use in producing or manufacturing a product or manufactured article. When the processor is a corporation, all the directors and officers of the corporation in their capacity as individuals are included, and any liability for failure to collect or make payment of assessments to which a corporate processor may be subject pursuant to this chapter includes the same liability for each individual director or officer of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 34.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76030.

“Marketing research” means any research relating to the marketing of cherries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 35.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76031.

“Marketing season” or “fiscal year” means the period beginning on April 1 of any year and extending through March 31 of the next year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 36.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76032.

“Process” means to engage in the business of a processor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76033.

“Producer” or “grower” means any person who is engaged within this state in the business of producing or causing to be produced on land totaling more than one acre, either for fresh market or for processing, cherries of any variety, and who upon request, provides proof of commodity sale. For purposes of voting, “producer” or “grower” does not include a person who purchases a cherry crop on the tree, and the right to vote remains with the person selling the cherry crop on the tree to the purchaser.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 37.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76034.

“Production research” means any research related to the production, harvest, and postharvest handling of cherries, other than marketing research.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The California Cherry Commission [76051. - 76067.]

76051.

(a) There is in state government the California Cherry Commission. The commission is composed of eight cherry producers or grower-handlers who are not shippers, two cherry shippers, and one public member. Producers and grower-handlers within the respective districts shall elect two producers or grower-handlers from District 1, one producer or grower-handler from District 2, three producers or grower-handlers from District 3, one producer or grower-handler from District 4, and one producer or grower-handler from District 5.

(b) Cherry shippers shall elect two shipper members.

(c) The public member shall be appointed to the commission by the director from nominees recommended by the commission.

(d) The director and other appropriate individuals as determined by the commission shall be ex officio members of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 38.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76052.

(a) The districts consist of the following:

(1) District 1 is all that area in San Joaquin County east of Jack Tone Road or any extension of that road.

(2) District 2 is all that area in San Joaquin County north of Live Oak Road and west of Jack Tone Road or any extension of that road.

(3) District 3 is all that area in San Joaquin County not included in Districts 1 and 2, and all of Stanislaus County.

(4) District 4 is all of San Benito and Santa Clara Counties.

(5) District 5 is all other counties.

(b) The boundaries of any district may be changed by a two-thirds vote of the commission, which is concurred in by the director, to insure proper representation by producers. The boundaries need not coincide with county lines.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76053.

When the director is required to concur in a decision of the commission, he or she shall indicate his or her response to the commission within 15 working days after receiving the decision. The response may be a request that additional information be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76054.

(a) The director may require the commission to correct or cease any existing activity or function which is determined by the director not to be in the public interest or which is in violation of this chapter.

(b) If the commission refuses or fails to cease the activities or functions or to make any corrections required by the director, the director may, upon written notice, suspend all or a portion of the activities or functions of the commission until the commission complies with the director.

(c) Actions of the commission in violation of the written notice are without legal force or effect. The director, to the extent feasible, shall issue the written notice prior to the commission entering into any contractual relationship affecting the existing or proposed activities or functions which are the subject of the written notice.

(d) Upon service of the written notice, the director shall notify the commission in writing of the specific acts which he or she determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter, and the reasons for requiring a cessation or correction of specific existing or proposed activities or functions. The director may make recommendations that will make the activities or functions acceptable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76055.

The commission or the director may bring an action for judicial relief from the director’s written notice, or from noncompliance by the commission with the written notice, as the case may be, in a court of competent jurisdiction, which may issue a temporary restraining order, permanent injunction, or other applicable relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 39.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76056.

The commission shall reimburse the director for all expenditures incurred by the director in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities under this chapter. However, the court may, if it finds that the director acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting activities or functions of the commission, relieve the commission of the responsibility for payment of the director’s legal costs with regard to the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76057.

Each member of the commission, except the ex officio members, shall have an alternate member to be elected in the same manner as the member. An alternative member shall, in the absence of the member for whom he or she is an alternate, serve in place of the member on the commission, and shall have and be able to exercise all the rights, privileges, and powers of the member when serving on the commission. In the event of death, removal, resignation, or the disqualification of a member, the alternate shall act as a member of the commission until a successor is elected and has qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76058.

Any vacancy on the commission occurring by the failure of any person elected to the commission as a member or alternate member to continue in his or her position due to a change in status making that member ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal or resignation, shall be filled, for the unexpired portion of the term, by a majority vote of the commission. However, the person chosen shall fulfill all the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the member whose office he or she is to fill. Qualifications of any person to fill a vacancy on the commission shall be certified in writing to the director. The director shall notify the commission if he or she determines that the person is not qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76059.

(a) Any producer member, grower-handler member, or the member’s alternate on the commission shall be an individual or an employee representing a producer who has a financial interest in producing, or causing to be produced, cherries for market or processing. The qualifications of a producer member, grower-handler member, and an alternate producer or grower-handler member shall be maintained during the entire term of office.

(b) Any shipper member or his or her alternate shall be an individual or an employee representing a shipper who has a financial interest in handling cherries for market or processing. The qualifications of a shipper member and an alternate shipper member shall be maintained during the entire term of office.

(c) Not more than one producer member, grower-handler member, or shipper member shall be a person employed by, or connected in a proprietary capacity with, the same corporation, firm, partnership, association, or business organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 40.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76060.

The public member or his or her alternate on the commission, shall have all the powers, rights, and privileges of any other member on the commission. The public member shall not have any financial interest in the cherry industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 41.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76061.

The term of office of all members of the commission, except any ex officio member, shall be two years from the date of their election and until their successors are qualified. However, of the first members of the commission, one-half of the producers or grower-handlers and shippers shall serve for one year, and one-half of the producers or grower-handlers and shippers shall serve for two years, with the determination of term of each such member to be made by lot at the time of election. Terms of office of each commissioner shall be limited to four consecutive terms, except that any member selected for a one-year term may serve not more than five consecutive terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 42.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76062.

The commission shall be and is hereby declared and created a corporate body. It shall have the power to sue and be sued, to contract and be contracted with, and to have and possess all of the powers of a corporation. It may adopt a corporate seal. Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts, when authenticated, shall be admissable in evidence in all courts of the state, and shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76063.

A quorum of the commission shall be any six voting commissioners. Except for Sections 76052 and 76182, the vote of the majority of members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum shall constitute the act of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76064.

The director or his or her representative shall be notified and may attend meetings of the commission, including committee meetings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76065.

No member of the commission or member of a committee established by the commission shall receive a salary. Each member of the commission, except ex officio government members, and each member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission may receive a sum of not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, as established by the commission, for each day spent in actual attendance at, or in traveling to and from, meetings of the commission or committees of the commission, or on special assignment for the commission, as approved by the commission, together with the necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances, as approved by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 43.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76066.

All money received by any person from the assessments levied under the authority of this chapter or otherwise received by the commission, shall be deposited in any bank that the commission may designate and shall be disbursed by order of the commission through any agent or agents that it may designate for that purpose. Any such agent or agents shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business as such in the state in favor of the commission, in the amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76067.

(a) The state is not liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts. Payments of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission shall be limited to the funds collected by the commission.

(b) No member of the commission or alternate member, or any employee or agent therefor, shall be personally liable on the contracts of the commission; be responsible individually in any way to any producer, processor, shipper, or grower-handler, or any other person for error in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, or employee, except for his or her own individual acts of dishonesty or crime; or be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any member of the commission. Liability shall be several and not joint, and no member of the commission shall be liable for the default of any other member of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 44.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of the Commission [76081. - 76099.]

76081.

The powers and duties of the commission include, but are not limited to, all of the powers and duties enumerated in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76082.

The commission may adopt and from time to time alter, rescind, modify, and amend all proper and necessary bylaws, rules, regulations, operating procedures, and orders for carrying out the provisions of this chapter, including rules for appeals from any bylaw, rule, regulation, operating procedure, or order of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 45.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76083.

The commission may administer and enforce this chapter, and do and perform all acts and exercise all powers incidental to, or in connection with, or deemed reasonably necessary for, proper or advisable effectuation of the purposes of this chapter. The commission may, in this connection, enter into contracts for services with public and private agencies as the commission determines is necessary to carry out this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 46.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76084.

The commission may appoint its own officers, including a chairman, one or more vice chairmen, and any other officers that it deems necessary. The officers shall have the powers and duties delegated to them by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76085.

The commission may employ a person to serve at the pleasure of the commission as president and chief executive officer of the commission, and other personnel, including legal counsel, that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The commission may retain a management firm or the staff from any board, commission, or committee of the state to perform the functions prescribed by this section under the control of the commission. If the person engages in any conduct which the director determines is not in the public interest or which is in violation of this chapter, the director shall notify the commission of the conduct and request that corrective and, if appropriate, disciplinary action be taken by the commission.

(b) In the event that the commission fails or refuses to correct the situation or to take disciplinary action satisfactory to the director, the director may suspend or discharge the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 47.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76086.

The commission may fix the compensation for all employees of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76087.

The commission may appoint committees composed of both members and nonmembers of the commission, such as a processor or shipper advisory committee, to advise the commission in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76088.

The commission may establish offices, incur expenses, enter into contracts and agreements, create liabilities, and borrow funds in advance of receipt of assessments that may be necessary, in the opinion of the commission, for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance of its duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 48.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76089.

(a) The commission shall keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all its dealings, which shall be subject to an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the commission with the concurrence of the director.

(b) A summary of the audit shall be made a part of an annual report to all producers of cherries, copies of which shall also be submitted to the Legislature and the department. In addition, the director may, as determined necessary, conduct or cause to be conducted a fiscal and compliance audit of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 49.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76090.

The commission may promote the sale of cherries by advertising and other promotional means, including cost-sharing advertising, for the purpose of maintaining and expanding present markets and creating new and larger intrastate, interstate, and foreign markets for cherries, and also may educate and instruct the public with respect to the uses, healthful properties, and nutritional value of cherries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76091.

The commission may educate and instruct the wholesale and retail trade with respect to proper methods of handling and selling cherries; make market surveys and analyses; present facts to, and negotiate with, state, federal, and foreign agencies on matters which affect the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 50.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76092.

The commission may make, in the name of the commission, contracts to render service in formulating and conducting plans and programs, and any other contracts or agreements that the commission may deem necessary for carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 51.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76093.

The commission may conduct and contract with others to conduct scientific research, including the study, analysis, dissemination, and accumulation of information obtained from research or elsewhere, regarding this chapter. In connection with the research, the commission may accept contributions of, or match, private, state, or federal funds that may be available for its purposes, and employ or make contributions of funds to other persons or state or federal agencies conducting the research.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 52.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76094.

The commission may publish and distribute, without charge, a bulletin or other communication for dissemination of information to producers, shippers, grower-handlers, and processors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 53.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76095.

The commission may establish an assessment rate to defray operating costs of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76096.

The commission may establish an annual budget according to accepted accounting practices. The budget shall be concurred in by the director prior to disbursement of funds, except for disbursements made pursuant to Section 76086.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76097.

The commission shall submit to the director, for his or her concurrence, an annual statement of contemplated activities authorized under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 54.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

76098.

The commission may manage, if requested by an advisory board, a board of directors, or any other authorized agent, any governmental program establishing grades and standards for the cherry industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

76099.

The commission may investigate and prosecute civil violations of this chapter and file complaints with appropriate law enforcement agencies or officers for suspected criminal violations of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Implementation and Voting Procedures [76111. - 76120.]

76111.

(a) Within 90 days after a request by the proponents of the commission, or as soon thereafter as possible, the director shall establish a list of producers eligible to vote on implementation of this chapter. In establishing the list, the director may require that processors, shippers, county agricultural commissioners, cherry producers and others, submit the names and mailing addresses of all producers. The director may also require that the information provided include the quantity of cherries marketed by producers and their district members or, in the alternative, may establish procedures for receiving the information at the time of the vote specified in Section 76112. The request for the information shall be in writing. The information shall be filed within 30 days following receipt of the written notice.

(b) Any producer whose name does not appear upon the director’s list may have his or her name established on the list by filing with the director a signed statement, identifying himself or herself as a producer. Failure to be on the list does not exempt the producer from paying assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 55.   Effective September 26, 1985.)